Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1414
Disclosure of indictment; when prohibited.

No grand juror or officer of the court shall disclose that an indictment has been found against any person not in custody or under bail, except by the issuing of process, until the indictment is filed.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 406, p. 815;

R.S.1913, § 9044;

C.S.1922, § 10068;

C.S.1929, § 29-1414;

R.S.1943, § 29-1414;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 52.